District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.02

Applicability.

This subchapter applies to an anatomical gift or amendment to, revocation of, or refusal to make an anatomical gift, whenever made.

History

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 3, 55 DCR 2532

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (2006).